Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2691XS (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 560 Section 1. Section 47.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The state registrar of voters shall use 3 information from the electronic registration information center 4 to update information in the statewide voter registration 5 system, including but not limited to all of the following 6 reports: 7 a. In-state duplicates. 8 b. In-state updates. 9 c. Cross-state matches. 10 d. Deceased. 11 e. Eligible but unregistered. 12 f. National change of address. 13